Maine, session 132, LD2119.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §3174-QQQ is enacted to read:
§3174-QQQ. Reimbursement for ambulance services
1. Reimbursement for ambulance services. The department shall provide
reimbursement under the MaineCare program for ambulance services, including:
A. Emergency transport to a hospital;
B. Treatment provided on the scene in response to an emergency call, regardless of
transport;
C. Care provided by an emergency medical services provider through community
paramedicine as defined in Title 32, section 84, subsection 4 through approved
community paramedicine services as described in Title 32, section 84, subsection 4;
and
D. Transport of a patient to an alternate destination. As used in this paragraph,
"alternate destination" means a facility other than a hospital emergency department that
is clinically appropriate for the patient's condition, including, but not limited to, an
urgent care center, federally qualified health center, primary care practice, behavioral
health crisis center, substance use treatment facility or other clinically appropriate site,
as permitted by the Department of Defense, Veterans and Emergency Management,
Maine Emergency Medical Services.
2. Rules. The department shall adopt rules to implement this section. Rules adopted
pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 2. 24-A MRSA §4303-F, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2025, c. 34, §1 and
affected by §2, is further amended by repealing the first blocked paragraph.
Sec. 3. 24-A MRSA §4303-F, sub-§5 is enacted to read:
5. Required reimbursement for ambulance services. A carrier that provides
coverage for emergency medical services shall reimburse for ambulance services,
including:
A. Emergency transport to a hospital;
B. Treatment provided on the scene in response to an emergency call, regardless of
transport;
C. Care provided by an emergency medical services provider through community
paramedicine as defined in Title 32, section 84, subsection 4 through approved
community paramedicine services as described in Title 32, section 84, subsection 4;
and
D. Transport of a patient to an alternate destination. As used in this paragraph,
"alternate destination" means a facility other than a hospital emergency department that
is clinically appropriate for the patient's condition, including, but not limited to, an
urgent care center, federally qualified health center, primary care practice, behavioral
health crisis center, substance use treatment facility or other clinically appropriate site,
Page 1 - 132LR2793(01)

411 as permitted by the Department of Defense, Veterans and Emergency Management,
422 Maine Emergency Medical Services.
Sec. 4. Rulemaking. The Department of Health and Human Services, in
consultation with the Department of Defense, Veterans and Emergency Management,
Maine Emergency Medical Services, shall adopt rules to implement this Act, including, but
not limited to:
1. Establishing clinical and documentation standards for treatment provided on the
scene in response to an emergency call, care provided by an emergency medical services
provider through community paramedicine and alternate destination transport;
2. Establishing billing and coding procedures; and
3. Establishing quality assurance and patient safety requirements.
Rules adopted under this section are routine technical rules as defined in the Maine
Revised Statutes, Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.